District of Columbia statutes.
22-3225.13

Immunity.

No person shall be subject to civil liability or criminal prosecution for reporting any suspected insurance fraud if:

(1)

The report was made to:

(A)

The Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking, the Metropolitan Police Department, or any other law enforcement authority; or

(B)

Any insurer, insurance agent, or other person who collects, reviews, or analyzes information concerning insurance fraud; and

(2)

The person or entity reporting the suspected fraud acted without malice when making the report.

History

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 125m
as added Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-254, § 2(d), 50 DCR 233
June 11, 2004, D.C. Law 15-166, § 4(b)(3), 51 DCR 2817

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-166, in par. (1)(A), substituted “Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking” for “Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(b)(3) of Consolidation of Financial Services Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-381, February 27, 2004, 51 DCR 2653).